Hawaii statutes.
[§429-11] Claim not abated by change.
A claim for relief against a nonprofit association shall not abate merely
because of a change in its members or persons authorized to manage the affairs
of the nonprofit association. [L 1999, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next